Utah statutes.
78B-7-112.   Division of Child and Family Services -- Development and assistance of volunteer network.

(1)  The Division of Child and Family Services within the Department of Human Services shall, either directly or by contract:

(a)  develop a statewide network of volunteers and community resources to support, assist, and advocate on behalf of victims of domestic violence;

(b)  train volunteers to provide clerical assistance to persons seeking orders for protection under this chapter;

(c)  coordinate the provision of volunteer services with Utah Legal Services and the Legal Aid Society; and

(d)  assist local government officials in establishing community based support systems for victims of domestic violence.

(2)  Volunteers shall provide additional nonlegal assistance to victims of domestic violence, including providing information on the location and availability of shelters and other community resources.

